Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB426.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, is amended by adding a 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829 section to read:Section 475.1. Legislative Youth Advisory Council.--(a) The Legislative Youth Advisory Council is established to examine issues of importance to youth, including education, employment, strategies to increase youth participation in State and municipal government, safe environments for youth, substance abuse, emotional and physical health, foster care, poverty, homelessness and youth access to services on a Statewide and municipal basis.(b) The council shall consist of fifty members, one from each senatorial district, at the time of appointment. The members of the council shall be no younger than fourteen years of age and no older than eighteen years of age. The council shall select a chair from among the members of the council.(c) Members of the council shall serve for a term of two years and, if eligible, may be reappointed for subsequent two-year terms.(d) During the first year of the council's establishment, each member of the Senate shall appoint an individual to the council. For each year thereafter, an individual may apply annually to be considered for nomination to the council by completing an online application form and submitting the application to the council and the Lieutenant Governor. The Lieutenant Governor shall make the application form available on the Lieutenant Governor's publicly accessible Internet website. The council may develop selection criteria and an application review process. Upon the conclusion of the application review process, the council shall recommend nominees to the council to the Lieutenant Governor. The Lieutenant Governor shall make the final selections to the council and notify each applicant of the 20250SB0426PN0398 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 final selections.(e) Subject to the supervision of the Lieutenant Governor, the council shall have the following duties:(1) Conduct periodic seminars for its members regarding leadership, State government and the General Assembly.(2) Accept and solicit for grants and donations from public and private sources to support the activities of the council.(3) Advise the General Assembly on proposed and pending legislation, including Commonwealth budget expenditures and policy matters relating to youth, and each standing committee, study commission, committee or task force of the General Assembly regarding issues relating to youth.(4) Provide an annual report to the General Assembly by December 1, 2026, and each December thereafter on the council's activities, including proposed and pending legislation that implements recommendations of the council.(f) To implement the council's duties under this section, the council shall meet at least three times per year. The council may use technology, including remote videoconferencing technology, to facilitate the members' participation in meetings. The council may invite members of the General Assembly to participate in the meetings. The council may poll individuals who are not members of the council to attain a broad perspective on various youth policy issues via technology or other means.(g) Members of the council may be reimbursed for expenses relating to the official duties of the council.(h) The Lieutenant Governor shall provide administration, supervision and facilitation support to the council. The General Assembly may provide policy and fiscal briefings and assistance with drafting proposed legislation. The General Assembly shall 20250SB0426PN0398 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 develop internal policies relating to staff assistance for the council, including applicable internal personnel and practices guidelines, resource use and expense reimbursement guidelines and applicable ethics mandates. The provision of funds, resources and staff to the council, including the assignment and direction of staff, shall be in the sole discretion of the General Assembly.(i) The Lieutenant Governor, the General Assembly and a legislative agency, including an official or employe, shall be immune from civil liability for any injury that is incurred by or caused by a member of the council and occurs while the member of the council is performing duties of the council or is otherwise engaged in activities or receiving services for which reimbursement is authorized under subsection (g). The immunity provided by this subsection shall not apply to an injury intentionally caused by the act or omission of an employe or official.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0426PN0398 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718